Hawaii statutes.
[§712A-18] Victim restitution.
Nothing herein precludes a court from ordering restitution or reparation to a
victim by the defendant as part of a sentence imposed for a violation of a
covered offense. The State shall not be compelled to provide funds for victim
restitution or reparation under this chapter. [L 1988, c 260, pt of §1, §7; am
L 1990, c 197, §1; am L 1993, c 196, §1; am L 1996, c 104, §6]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next